Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska3-302
Airport hazard; public nuisance; prevention.

It is hereby found that an airport hazard endangers the lives and property of the users of an airport and occupants of land in its vicinity and also, if of the obstruction type, in effect reduces the size of the area available for the landing, taking off and maneuvering of aircraft, thus tending to destroy or impair the utility of the airport and the public investment therein. Accordingly, it is hereby declared: (1) That the creation or establishment of an airport hazard is a public nuisance and an injury to the community served by the airport in question; (2) that it is therefor necessary in the interest of the public health, public safety, and general welfare that the creation or establishment of airport hazards be prevented; and (3) that this should be accomplished, to the extent legally possible, by the exercise of the police power, without compensation. It is further declared that both the prevention of the creation or establishment of airport hazards and the elimination, removal, alteration, mitigation, or marking and lighting of existing airport hazards are public purposes for which political subdivisions may raise and expend public funds and acquire land or property interests therein.

Laws 1945, c. 233, § 2, p. 683.